West Virginia, session 2026, HB4975.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2L. Consolidation of county-based school districts. §18-2L-1. Consolidation of county-based school districts. (a) Effective July 1, 2030, the 55 county-based school districts shall be consolidated into 11 regional districts. (b) The 11 regional districts shall be compromised in the following manner:(1) Region 1: McDowell, Mercer, Monroe, Raleigh, Summers, Wyoming; (2) Region 2: Cabell, Lincoln, Logan, Mason, Mingo, Wayne; (3) Region 3: Boone, Clay, Kanawha, Putnam; (4) Region 4: Fayette, Greenbrier, Nicholas, Pocahontas, Webster; (5) Region 5: Calhoun, Jackson, Pleasants, Ritchie, Roane, Tyler, Wirt, Wood; (6) Region 6: Doddridge, Harrison, Marion, Monongalia, Preston, Taylor; (7) Region 7: Barbour, Braxton, Gilmer, Lewis, Randolph, Tucker, Upshur; (8) Region 8: Grant, Hampshire, Hardy, Mineral, Pendleton; (9) Region 9: Berkeley, Jefferson, Morgan; (10) Region 10: Marshall, Ohio, Wetzel; and(11) Region 11: Brooke, Hancock.